Wyoming statutes. Title 38 Sureties
Chapter 3 Surety Companies

Cross references. —

As to authorization of insurers and general requirements, see §

26-3-101

et seq.

§ 38-3-101.
Execution of bonds.

Whenever any bond, undertaking, recognizance or other obligation is by law, or the charter, ordinances, rules or regulations of any municipality, board, body, organization, court or public officer, required or permitted to be made, given, tendered or filed, with surety or sureties, and whenever the performance of any act, duty or obligation, or the refraining from any act, is required or permitted to be guaranteed, such bond, undertaking, obligation, recognizance or guarantee may be executed by a surety company qualified to act as surety or guarantor as hereinafter provided, and such execution by such company of such bond, undertaking, obligation, recognizance or guarantee shall be in all respects a full and complete compliance with every requirement of law, charter, ordinance, rule or regulation, that such bond, undertaking, obligation, recognizance or guarantee shall be executed by one (1) surety or by one (1) or more sureties or that such sureties shall be residents or householders, or freeholders or either, or both, or possess any other qualification; and all courts, judges, heads of departments, boards, bodies, municipalities and public officers of every character, shall accept and treat accordingly such bond, undertaking, obligation, recognizance or guarantee when so executed by such company, as conforming to and fully and completely complying with every such requirement of every such law, charter, ordinance, rule or regulation.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 94, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 3248; C.S. 1910, § 4145; C.S. 1920, § 5295; R.S. 1931, § 113-101; C.S. 1945, § 68-201; W.S. 1957, § 38-19.

§ 38-3-102.
Requiring bond with company unauthorized to transact business.

It shall hereafter be unlawful for any person, association or corporation, foreign or domestic, to require any person in his or its employ to make or execute, or to procure to be made or executed, any bond or undertaking for the faithful discharge of his duties, or upon any other consideration, with any corporation not organized under the laws of the state of Wyoming, as surety thereon, unless said corporation shall first have complied with the laws of the state of Wyoming, authorizing it to transact business therein.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 74, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 4152; C.S. 1920, § 5302; R.S. 1931, § 113-108; C.S. 1945, § 68-208; W.S. 1957, § 38-25.

§ 38-3-103.
Requiring bond with company unauthorized to transact business; bonds with such surety void.

All bonds and undertakings entered into by any citizen or resident of the state of Wyoming, with any such organization as surety, touching or affecting any services to be rendered or acts to be performed in the state of Wyoming, in whole or in part, unless such corporation shall first have complied with the laws of the state of Wyoming, shall be void.

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 74, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 4153; C.S. 1920, § 5303; R.S. 1931, § 113-109; C.S. 1945, § 68-209; W.S. 1957, § 38-26.

§ 38-3-104.
Execution of bonds; penalty.

Any person, association or corporation which shall exact or require of any person, or make it a condition of employment, or the retention of employment, that he make or execute any bond or undertaking with any such corporation, having so failed to comply with the laws of the state of Wyoming, entitling it to transact business therein, as surety thereof, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00), and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).

History.

Laws 1907, ch. 74, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 4154; C.S. 1920, § 5304; R.S. 1931, § 113-110; C.S. 1945, § 68-210; W.S. 1957, § 38-27.